Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.180

Oaths and acknowledgments.

Officers and employees of the department designated by the director are, for the purpose of administering the motor vehicle laws, authorized to administer oaths and acknowledge signatures and shall do so without fee.

[ 1965 c 156 s 18.]

NOTES:

Oath of director: RCW 43.17.030.